Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1241.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 26 O.S. 2021, Section 2-111.2, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 2-111.2. On the first Monday in June, 1983, and every
four (4) years thereafter, the county election board shall meet upon
call of the secretary to elect a chairman and vice chairman. The
secretary can be elected neither chairman nor vice chairman but and
shall not be a voting member of the county election board.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-11124 MJ 12/12/24


Req. No. 11124 Page 1